apertium-id-ms.ms.dix
    <pardef n="diajar-ajarinya__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="actio"/><s n="pasv"/><s n="red"/><s n="si"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="diajari__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="actio"/><s n="pasv"/><s n="si"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="diajarinya__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="actio"/><s n="pasv"/><s n="si"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="ditertawakan__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="actio"/><s n="pasv"/><s n="ter"/><s n="kan"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="ditertawakannya__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="actio"/><s n="pasv"/><s n="ter"/><s n="kan"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="tertawa__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="actio"/><s n="ter"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="sekelas__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="attr"/><s n="se"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="keberhasilan-keberhasilan__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="ke-an"/><s n="ber"/><s n="red"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="keberhasilan-keberhasilannya__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="ke-an"/><s n="ber"/><s n="red"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="keberhasilan__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="ke-an"/><s n="ber"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="keberhasilannya__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="ke-an"/><s n="ber"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="kepenyairan-kepenyairan__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="ke-an"/><s n="peN"/><s n="red"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="kepenyairan-kepenyairannya__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="ke-an"/><s n="peN"/><s n="red"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="kepenyairan__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="ke-an"/><s n="peN"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="kepenyairannya__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="ke-an"/><s n="peN"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="kepemilikan__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="ke-an"/><s n="pe"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="kedokteran-kedokteran__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="ke-an"/><s n="red"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="kedokteran-kedokterannya__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="ke-an"/><s n="red"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="kedokteran__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="ke-an"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="kedokterannya__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="ke-an"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="keterbatasan-keterbatasan__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="ke-an"/><s n="ter"/><s n="red"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="keterbatasan-keterbatasannya__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="ke-an"/><s n="ter"/><s n="red"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="keterbatasan__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="ke-an"/><s n="ter"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="keterbatasannya__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="ke-an"/><s n="ter"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="pejajaran-pejajaran__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="pe-an"/><s n="red"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="pejajaran-pejajarannya__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="pe-an"/><s n="red"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="pejajaran__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="pe-an"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="pejajarannya__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="pe-an"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="petinju-petinju__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="pe"/><s n="red"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="petinju-petinjunya__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="pe"/><s n="red"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="petinju__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="pe"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="petinjunya__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="pe"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="pemberlakuan-pemberlakuan__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="peN-an"/><s n="ber"/><s n="red"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="pemberlakuan-pemberlakuannya__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="peN-an"/><s n="ber"/><s n="red"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="pemberlakuan__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="peN-an"/><s n="ber"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="pemberlakuannya__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="peN-an"/><s n="ber"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="pemercontohan-pemercontohan__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="peN-an"/><s n="per"/><s n="red"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="pemercontohan-pemercontohannya__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="peN-an"/><s n="per"/><s n="red"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="pemercontohan__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="peN-an"/><s n="per"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="pemercontohannya__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="peN-an"/><s n="per"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="pendaftaran-pendaftaran__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="peN-an"/><s n="red"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="pendaftaran-pendaftarannya__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="peN-an"/><s n="red"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="pendaftaran__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="peN-an"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="pendaftarannya__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="peN-an"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="penertawaan-penertawaan__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="peN-an"/><s n="ter"/><s n="red"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="ampun"><p><l>diampuni</l><r>ampun</r></p><par n="diajari__n"/></e>
    <e lm="tangan"><p><l>ditangani</l><r>tangan</r></p><par n="diajari__n"/></e>
    <e lm="untung"><p><l>keberuntungan</l><r>untung</r></p><par n="keberhasilan__n"/></e>
    <e lm="raja"><p><l>kerajaan-kerajaan</l><r>raja</r></p><par n="kedokteran-kedokteran__n"/></e>
    <e lm="cedera"><p><l>kecederaan</l><r>cedera</r></p><par n="kedokteran__n"/></e>
    <e lm="islam"><p><l>keislaman</l><r>islam</r></p><par n="kedokteran__n"/></e>
    <e lm="masyarakat"><p><l>kemasyarakatan</l><r>masyarakat</r></p><par n="kedokteran__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ragam"><p><l>keragaman</l><r>ragam</r></p><par n="kedokteran__n"/></e>
    <e lm="daulat"><p><l>kedaulatannya</l><r>daulat</r></p><par n="kedokterannya__n"/></e>
    <e lm="esok"><p><l>keesokannya</l><r>esok</r></p><par n="kedokterannya__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kuasa"><p><l>kekuasaannya</l><r>kuasa</r></p><par n="kedokterannya__n"/></e>
    <e lm="presiden"><p><l>kepresidenannya</l><r>presiden</r></p><par n="kedokterannya__n"/></e>
    <e lm="gunung"><p><l>pegunungan</l><r>gunung</r></p><par n="pejajaran__n"/></e>
    <e lm="laksana"><p><l>pelaksanaan</l><r>laksana</r></p><par n="pejajaran__n"/></e>
    <e lm="manfaat"><p><l>pemanfaatan</l><r>manfaat</r></p><par n="pejajaran__n"/></e>
    <e lm="nama"><p><l>penamaan</l><r>nama</r></p><par n="pejajaran__n"/></e>
    <e lm="laksana"><p><l>pelaksanaannya</l><r>laksana</r></p><par n="pejajarannya__n"/></e>
    <e lm="makam"><p><l>pemakamannya</l><r>makam</r></p><par n="pejajarannya__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ajar"><p><l>pembelajaran</l><r>ajar</r></p><par n="pemberlakuan__n"/></e>
    <e lm="alam"><p><l>pengalaman-pengalaman</l><r>alam</r></p><par n="pendaftaran-pendaftaran__n"/></e>
    <e lm="pikir"><p><l>pemikiran-pemikiran</l><r>pikir</r></p><par n="pendaftaran-pendaftaran__n"/></e>
    <e lm="berkat"><p><l>pemberkatan</l><r>berkat</r></p><par n="pendaftaran__n"/></e>
    <e lm="dahulu"><p><l>pendahuluan</l><r>dahulu</r></p><par n="pendaftaran__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kuasa"><p><l>penguasaan</l><r>kuasa</r></p><par n="pendaftaran__n"/></e>
    <e lm="tambah"><p><l>penambahan</l><r>tambah</r></p><par n="pendaftaran__n"/></e>
    <e lm="bentuk"><p><l>pembentukannya</l><r>bentuk</r></p><par n="pendaftarannya__n"/></e>
    <e lm="diri"><p><l>pendiriannya</l><r>diri</r></p><par n="pendaftarannya__n"/></e>
    <e lm="pikir"><p><l>pemikirannya</l><r>pikir</r></p><par n="pendaftarannya__n"/></e>
    <e lm="dagang"><p><l>pedagang-pedagang</l><r>dagang</r></p><par n="petinju-petinju__n"/></e>
    <e lm="gawai"><p><l>pegawai-pegawai</l><r>gawai</r></p><par n="petinju-petinju__n"/></e>
    <e lm="minat"><p><l>peminat-peminat</l><r>minat</r></p><par n="petinju-petinju__n"/></e>
    <e lm="lakon"><p><l>pelakon-pelakonnya</l><r>lakon</r></p><par n="petinju-petinjunya__n"/></e>
    <e lm="guam"><p><l>peguam</l><r>guam</r></p><par n="petinju__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ladang"><p><l>peladang</l><r>ladang</r></p><par n="petinju__n"/></e>
    <e lm="milik"><p><l>pemilik</l><r>milik</r></p><par n="petinju__n"/></e>
    <e lm="tinju"><p><l>petinju</l><r>tinju</r></p><par n="petinju__n"/></e>
    <e lm="milik"><p><l>pemiliknya</l><r>milik</r></p><par n="petinjunya__n"/></e>
    <e lm="minat"><p><l>peminatnya</l><r>minat</r></p><par n="petinjunya__n"/></e>
    <e lm="waris"><p><l>pewarisnya</l><r>waris</r></p><par n="petinjunya__n"/></e>
    <e lm="helai"><p><l>sehelai</l><r>helai</r></p><par n="sekelas__n"/></e>
    <e lm="keliling"><p><l>sekeliling</l><r>keliling</r></p><par n="sekelas__n"/></e>
    <e lm="misal"><p><l>semisal</l><r>misal</r></p><par n="sekelas__n"/></e>
    <e lm="rantau"><p><l>serantau</l><r>rantau</r></p><par n="sekelas__n"/></e>
    <e lm="cermin"><p><l>tercermin</l><r>cermin</r></p><par n="tertawa__n"/></e>
    <e lm="gerak"><p><l>tergerak</l><r>gerak</r></p><par n="tertawa__n"/></e>
    <e lm="laksana"><p><l>terlaksana</l><r>laksana</r></p><par n="tertawa__n"/></e>
    <e lm="sirat"><p><l>tersirat</l><r>sirat</r></p><par n="tertawa__n"/></e>
